South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3468.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Lottery Scholarship Increase and Inflation Adjustment Act." SECTION 2.  Chapter 150, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-150-420.  (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the South Carolina Commission on Higher Education shall increase the amounts of the lottery scholarships awarded to students, as provided in this chapter, by twenty-five percent beginning in the 2025-2026 academic year. (B) Beginning in 2030 and every five years thereafter, the Commission on Higher Education shall adjust the scholarship amounts to reflect the rate of inflation as measured by the Consumer Price Index. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----